trunk/apertium-sv-da/apertium-sv-da.da.dix
    <pardef n="hold/e__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__voice"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__voice"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ende</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="sl/å__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>å</l>
          <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__voice"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>år</l>
          <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ås</l>
          <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>og</l>
          <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__voice"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>å</l>
          <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ående</l>
          <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ået</l>
          <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="tr/æffe__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>æffe</l>
          <r>æffe<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__voice"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>æffer</l>
          <r>æffe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>æffes</l>
          <r>æffe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>af</l>
          <r>æffe<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__voice"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>æf</l>
          <r>æffe<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>æfende</l>
          <r>æffe<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uffet</l>
          <r>æffe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mal/e__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__voice"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ede</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__voice"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="s/e__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__voice"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>å</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__voice"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="bl/ive__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iv</l>
          <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ive</l>
          <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iver</l>
	  <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ev</l>
          <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>evet</l>
          <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="k/unne__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>unne</l>
          <r>unne<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>an</l>
          <r>unne<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>unne</l>
          <r>unne<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>unnet</l>
          <r>unne<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="sk/ulle__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ulle</l>
          <r>ulle<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>al</l>
          <r>ulle<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ulle</l>
          <r>ulle<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ullet</l>
          <r>ulle<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="vil/le__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>le</l>
          <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>le</l>
          <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>let</l>
          <r>le<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="må/tte__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tte</l>
          <r>tte<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>tte<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tte</l>
          <r>tte<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ttet</l>
          <r>tte<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="f/å__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>å</l>
          <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="actv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>år</l>
          <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ik</l>
          <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>å</l>
          <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ået</l>
          <r>å<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="holde"><i>hold</i><par n="hold/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="holde pause"><i>hold</i><par n="hold/e__vblex"/><p><l><b/>pause</l><r><g><b/>pause</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="træffe"><i>tr</i><par n="tr/æffe__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="slå"><i>sl</i><par n="sl/å__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="indgå"><i>indg</i><par n="f/å__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="undgå"><i>undg</i><par n="f/å__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="skrive"><i>skr</i><par n="bl/ive__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="beskrive"><i>beskr</i><par n="bl/ive__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="afbalancere"><i>afbalancer</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="afgnave"><i>afgnav</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="afgå"><i>afg</i><par n="f/å__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="aflejre"><i>aflejr</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="afpudse"><i>afpuds</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="afskrive"><i>afskr</i><par n="bl/ive__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="afspadsere"><i>afspadser</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="aktualisere"><i>aktualiser</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="anse"><i>ans</i><par n="s/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="antaste"><i>antast</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="autorisere"><i>autoriser</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="beføje"><i>beføj</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bemægtige"><i>bemægtig</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="besmitte"><i>besmitt</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bevogte"><i>bevogt</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bolle"><i>boll</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bugne"><i>bugn</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="cykle"><i>cykl</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dirigere"><i>diriger</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dyrke"><i>dyrk</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="efterskrive"><i>efterskr</i><par n="bl/ive__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="erodere"><i>eroder</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="forbigå"><i>forbig</i><par n="f/å__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="forevige"><i>forevig</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="forudse"><i>foruds</i><par n="s/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="fotografere"><i>fotografer</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="fremgå"><i>fremg</i><par n="f/å__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="gennemgå"><i>gennemg</i><par n="f/å__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="halshugge"><i>halshugg</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="imødegå"><i>imødeg</i><par n="f/å__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="imødese"><i>imødes</i><par n="s/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="individualisere"><i>individualiser</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kalke"><i>kalk</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="konfirmere"><i>konfirmer</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="linjere"><i>linjer</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="nedskrive"><i>nedskr</i><par n="bl/ive__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="neutralisere"><i>neutraliser</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="omskrive"><i>omskr</i><par n="bl/ive__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="passere"><i>passer</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="resignere"><i>resigner</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="slinge"><i>sling</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="svælge"><i>svælg</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="udruge"><i>udrug</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="udskrive"><i>udskr</i><par n="bl/ive__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="aftegne"><i>aftegn</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="blive"><i>bl</i><par n="bl/ive__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dvæle"><i>dvæl</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="forpagte"><i>forpagt</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="få"><i>f</i><par n="f/å__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="grine"><i>grin</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="gå"><i>g</i><par n="f/å__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="foregå"><i>foreg</i><par n="f/å__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="forgå"><i>forg</i><par n="f/å__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kanalisere"><i>kanaliser</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kunne"><i>k</i><par n="k/unne__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="medregne"><i>medregn</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="måtte"><i>må</i><par n="må/tte__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="oplagre"><i>oplagr</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="påvirke"><i>påvirk</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="se"><i>s</i><par n="s/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="skelne"><i>skeln</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="skulle"><i>sk</i><par n="sk/ulle__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sultestrejke"><i>sultestrejk</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="udkæmpe"><i>udkæmp</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ville"><i>vil</i><par n="vil/le__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="øge"><i>øg</i><par n="mal/e__vblex"/></e>
